California statutes. Education Code
(d) Any changes made pursuant to this section to the Part-time Community College Faculty Health Insurance Program shall not affect any part-time health insurance program in effect on January 1, 2000.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 572, Sec. 12.   (AB 190)   Effective September 27, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

87864.

A part-time faculty member, multidistrict part-time faculty member, or their dependents whose premiums for health insurance are paid by an employer other than a community college district
 are not eligible to participate in the program established pursuant to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 572, Sec. 13.   (AB 190)   Effective September 27, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

87865.

(a) A multidistrict part-time faculty member who individually purchases health insurance benefits is eligible to participate in the program established pursuant to this article.

(b) (1) A community college district shall reimburse a multidistrict part-time faculty member for the district’s proportionate share of the total health insurance premium paid by the multidistrict part-time faculty member, up to a proportionate share of the maximum of the full cost of the district’s most commonly subscribed family coverage plan.

(2) The community college district’s proportionate share shall be determined by dividing the total health insurance premium paid by the
 multidistrict part-time faculty member by the total number of community college districts in which the multidistrict part-time faculty member works for purposes of meeting the requirements of subdivision (b) of Section 87861, and multiplying that quotient by the percentage of health care cost paid by the community college district toward the total cost of the health insurance premium.

(c) A community college district may require reasonable documentation from a multidistrict part-time faculty member to verify that the faculty member’s total cumulative teaching assignments at two or more community college districts equals or exceeds 40 percent of the cumulative equivalent of a minimum full-time teaching assignment. A community college district may require reasonable documentation from a multidistrict part-time faculty member to determine the district’s proportionate share, as described in subdivision (b), which may include, but is not necessarily
 limited to, documentation verifying enrollment in a health insurance plan and the premium paid for the health insurance plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 572, Sec. 14.   (AB 190)   Effective September 27, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

87866.

The governing board of each community college district that establishes a program pursuant to this article shall do both of the following:

(a) Negotiate with the exclusive representative as to the payment of the portion of the health insurance premium that is not funded by the state.

(b) By June 1 of each year, send verification to the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges as to the number of participants in the program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 943, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

87867.

(a) By June 15 of each year, the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall apportion to each community college district that establishes a program pursuant to this article an amount that equals up to one-half of the total cost of the individual premiums required to be paid for the health insurance coverage of participating part-time
 faculty, multidistrict part-time faculty, and their dependents in the district.

(b) By June 15 of each year, the chancellor shall apportion any remaining funds appropriated for this program to each community college district that establishes a program pursuant to this article and meets all of the following criteria, up to the total cost of the individual premiums required to be paid for the health insurance coverage of participating part-time faculty, multidistrict part-time faculty, and their dependents in the district:

(1) Offers health insurance coverage to all part-time faculty who meet the requirements in subdivision (c) of Section 87861.

(2) Offers part-time faculty the same health insurance benefits provided to the full-time faculty at the community college district.

(3) Limits individual premiums paid by part-time faculty to no more than the actual individual premium paid by full-time faculty in that district.

(4) Offers health insurance coverage to
 all multidistrict part-time faculty who meet the requirements in subdivision (b) of Section 87861, and pursuant to Section 87865.

(c) The chancellor shall distribute funds that have been appropriated specifically for this
 purpose, and pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b), proportionally based on each community college district’s total costs for premiums for those districts that submit verification of the costs of premiums for eligible employees for a fiscal year, but in no event shall the allocation to any district exceed the full cost of the verified premiums.

(d) If funds appropriated for this purpose
 remain after all apportionments for subdivisions (a) and (b) have been made, the balance that exceeds that amount shall revert to the General Fund annually.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 572, Sec. 15.   (AB 190)   Effective September 27, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

87868.

It is the intent of the Legislature that ongoing funding for the purposes of this article be subject to annual Budget Act appropriations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 943, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Community College Part-Time Faculty Office Hours Program [87880. - 87885.]

87880.

The Legislature finds and declares that community college part-time faculty are required to fulfill the same teaching responsibilities as full-time faculty although students have little or no access to part-time faculty members outside of the classroom. It is the intent of the Legislature that students have the same opportunity for academic assistance and guidance without regard to whether a course at a community college is taught by a full-time or a part-time faculty member. It is the further intent of the Legislature that community college part-time faculty teaching a minimum number of courses be compensated for providing academic counseling and assistance to students outside of the classroom.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 933, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

87881.

There is hereby established the Community College Part-Time Faculty Office Hours Program for the purpose of providing community college students equal access to academic advice and assistance and to encourage community college districts to provide opportunities by compensating part-time faculty who hold office hours related to their teaching load.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 933, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

87882.

For purposes of this article, “part-time faculty” means any person who is employed to teach for not more than the hours per week described in Section 87482.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 187, Sec. 9.   (SB 511)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

87883.

(a) The governing board of a community college district may provide compensation for office hours to part-time faculty.

(b) The compensation paid to part-time faculty under this article shall equal at least one paid office hour for every two classes or more taught each week or 40 percent of a full-time load as defined by the community college district.

(c) Nothing in this section precludes compensation under this program for paid office time for each 20 percent of a full-time load, or fraction thereof, as defined by the community college district.

(d) The change made to subdivision (c) during the 1999 portion of the 1999–2000 Regular Session of the Legislature shall be operative in any fiscal year only if funds are appropriated for purposes of that change in the annual Budget Act or in another measure. If the amount appropriated in the annual Budget Act or in another measure for purposes of this section is insufficient to fully fund that change for the fiscal year, the chancellor shall prorate the funds among the community college districts affected by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 738, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

87884.

(a) The governing board of each community college district that establishes a program pursuant to this article shall negotiate with the exclusive bargaining representative, or in instances where there is no bargaining unit shall meet and confer with the faculty, to establish a program to provide part-time faculty office hours.

(b) Any hours negotiated under this program shall not be applied toward the maximum percentage-of-hours limitation for part-time faculty as specified in Section 87882. These hours shall not be counted towards the hours per week of teaching adult or community college classes for purposes of acquiring eligibility for tenure or for purposes of fulfilling any
 probationary hour requirements.

(c) On or before June 1 of each year, each community college district participating in the program shall send a verification to the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges specifying the total costs of the compensation paid for office hours of part-time faculty participating in the program.

(d) Any changes made by this section to the Community College Part-Time Faculty Office Hours Program shall not affect any part-time faculty office hours program in effect on January 1, 2000.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 349, Sec. 11.   (SB 940)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

87885.

(a) The Part-Time Faculty Office Hours Program Fund is hereby established in the State Treasury.

(b) On or before June 15 of each year, the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall apportion to each community college district that establishes a program pursuant to this article an amount of up to 90 percent of the total costs of compensation paid for office hours of part-time faculty, as defined in Section 87882. The chancellor shall distribute funds that are appropriated in the annual Budget Act specifically for this purpose proportionally based on each district’s total costs for office hours of part-time faculty pursuant to the verification submitted by the community college district in accordance with subdivision (c) of Section
 87884 for that fiscal year. In no event, however, shall the allocation to any district in a fiscal year exceed 90 percent of the total costs of the compensation paid for office hours of part-time faculty pursuant to this article.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that funding for the purposes of this article be included in the annual Budget Act.

(d) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2024.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 8) and added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 71, Sec. 9.   (SB 155)   Effective July 2, 2024.   Operative July 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Full-time Faculty and Faculty Diversity [87890. - 87894.]

87890.

As used in this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Faculty diversity” means the representation of faculty members from different racial, ethnic, gender, and disability groups, and other underrepresented groups.

(b) “Full-time faculty” means a faculty member who is employed by a community college on a full-time basis and teaches more than a 67-percent load.

(c) “FTES” means full-time equivalent students.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 50, Sec. 13.   (SB 117)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

87891.

(a) Each community college district shall report on or before March 31, 2024, and each March 31 thereafter, to the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges on its progress in increasing the percentage of instruction by full-time faculty and in increasing faculty diversity.

(b) The report shall include the number of full-time faculty positions filled and maintained with the funds allocated for that purpose in the prior fiscal year, the percentage of the funds used in the prior fiscal year, and the cumulative total of the funds used and unused.

(c) The report shall also include, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(1) The number and percentage of instruction taught by full-time faculty as measured by the regulatory definition and calculation of full-time equivalent faculty.

(2) The number of units and FTES and percentage of units and FTES taught by full-time faculty.

(3) The number and percentage breakdown of full-time faculty disaggregated by race, ethnicity, gender, disability, and other relevant categories.

(4) The number and percentage breakdown of part-time faculty disaggregated by race, ethnicity, gender, disability, and other relevant categories.

(5) The number and percentage breakdown of part-time faculty who have applied for or been offered full-time positions.

(6) The number and percentage breakdown of faculty who have left or retired from their positions.

(7) The number and percentage breakdown of full-time faculty on release, sabbatical, or paid leave.

(8) The number of classroom student interaction hours taught by full-time faculty each week as part of their contractual load.

(9) The strategies and actions taken by the community college district to address challenges and barriers faced by the community college district in increasing full-time faculty and faculty diversity in support of student success and completion.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 50, Sec. 13.   (SB 117)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

87892.

(a) The office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall, on or before May 30, 2024, and each May 30 thereafter, synthesize the information received from community college districts pursuant to Section 87891 into a systemwide report to be posted on a public internet website.

(b) The report shall be submitted in a format prescribed by the chancellor’s office that ensures consistency, accuracy, and comparability of the information across community college districts.

(c) The report shall include, at a minimum, the following information for each community college district:

(1) The number of
 full-time faculty positions filled and maintained with the funds allocated for that purpose in the prior fiscal year.

(2) The amount and percentage of the funds used in the prior fiscal year.

(3) The cumulative total of the funds used and unused.

(4) The number and percentage of instruction taught by full-time faculty as measured by the regulatory definition and calculation of full-time equivalent faculty.

(5) The number of units and FTES and percentage of units and FTES taught by full-time faculty.

(6) The number and percentage breakdown of full-time faculty disaggregated by race, ethnicity, gender, disability, and other relevant categories.

(7) The number and percentage breakdown of part-time faculty disaggregated by race, ethnicity, gender, disability, and other relevant categories.

(8) The number and percentage breakdown of part-time faculty who have applied for or been offered full-time positions.

(9) The number and percentage breakdown of faculty who have left or retired from their positions.

(10) The number and percentage breakdown of full-time faculty on release, sabbatical, or paid leave.

(11) The number of classroom student interaction hours taught by full-time faculty each week as part of their contractual load.

(12) The strategies and actions taken by the
 community college district to address challenges and barriers faced by the community college district in increasing full-time faculty and faculty diversity in support of student success and completion.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 50, Sec. 13.   (SB 117)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

87893.

(a) The office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall establish and implement a policy verifying that community districts are using full-time faculty funding appropriated in Item 6870-101-0001 of Section 2.00 of the annual Budget Act for the designated purposes and in accordance with applicable laws and regulations.

(b) The policy shall include, at a minimum, all of the following methods:

(1) Require community college districts to submit evidence of fund expenditure, including the number of full-time faculty positions filled and maintained with the funds allocated for that purpose.

(2) Provide technical assistance and guidance to community college districts on best practices and compliance requirements.

(3) Report any findings of misuse, waste, fraud, or abuse of funds and take corrective actions, as necessary.

(c) The Legislature shall be informed of any community college district that fails to comply with this article and each failing community college district shall be subject to notice at a meeting of the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 50, Sec. 13.   (SB 117)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

87894.

This article shall only apply to a community college district as a condition of receiving funds for the purpose of hiring new full-time faculty appropriated in Item 6870-101-0001 of Section 2.00 of the annual Budget Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 50, Sec. 13.   (SB 117)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Classified Employees [88000. - 88280.]



  ARTICLE 1. Employment [88000. - 88040.]

88000.

This article, Article 2 (commencing with Section 88050), Article 4 (commencing with Section 88160), Article 5 (commencing with Section 88180), Article 6 (commencing with Section 88190), Article 8 (commencing with Section 88240), and Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 87000) shall apply to all classified employees of a community college district, whether a merit or nonmerit system district as authorized by this chapter unless the section specifically limits its application to nonmerit system districts.

These provisions shall not apply to employees of a community college district lying wholly within a city and county that provides in its charter for a merit system of employment for employees employed in positions that are part of the classified service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 185.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

88001.

As used in this chapter the following terms mean:

(a) “Classification” means that each position in the classified service shall have a designated title, a regular minimum number of assigned hours per day, days per week, and months per year, a specific statement of the duties required to be performed by the employees in each such position, and the regular monthly salary ranges for each such position.

(b) “Permanent,” as used in the phrase “permanent employee,” includes tenure in the classification in which the employee passed the required probationary period and includes all of the incidents of that classification.

(c) “Regular,” as used in the phrase “regular classified employee,” or any similar phrase, refers to a classified employee who has probationary or permanent status.

(d) “Demotion” means assignment to an inferior position or status without the employee’s written voluntary consent.

(e) “Disciplinary action” includes any action whereby an employee is deprived of any classification or any incident of any classification in which he or she has permanence, including dismissal, suspension, demotion, or any reassignment, without his or her voluntary consent, except a layoff for lack of work or lack of funds.

(f) “Reclassification” means the upgrading of a position to a higher classification as a result of the gradual increase of the duties being performed by the incumbent in that position.

(g) “Layoff for lack of funds or layoff for lack of work” includes any reduction in hours of employment or assignment to a class or grade lower than that in which the employee has permanence, voluntarily consented to by the employee, in order to avoid interruption of employment by layoff.

(h) “Cause,” relating to disciplinary actions against classified employees, means those grounds for discipline or offenses enumerated in the law or the written rules of a community college employer. No disciplinary action may be maintained for any “cause” other than as defined herein.

This section shall not apply to districts to which Article 3 (commencing with Section 88060) is applicable.

This section shall not apply to any district which, during the 1973–74 college year, had an average daily attendance of 100,000 or more.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 186.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

88002.

(a) For the purposes of this section, every classified employee shall be deemed to be employed for 12 months during each college year regardless of the number of months in which he or she is normally in paid status.

(b) If, during a college year, it is necessary to assign a regular classified employee to perform an assignment or service in addition to his or her regular assignment, a community college district shall pay the classified employee on a pro rata basis for the additional assignment or service, not less than the compensation and benefits that are applicable to the classification of the additional assignment or service during the regular college year, unless the community college district has negotiated a contract that allows for a lesser pay scale. A community college district shall inform a classified employee of the compensation and benefits of the additional assignment or service before the employee commences the additional assignment or service.

(c) A community college district that, in any college year, maintains school sessions at times other than during the regular academic year shall assign for service, during those times, regular classified employees of the district.

(d) If it is necessary to assign classified employees not regularly so assigned to serve between the end of one academic year and the commencement of another, the assignment shall be made on the basis of qualifications for employment in each classification of service that is required. 

(1) A community college district may not require a classified employee whose regular yearly assignment for service excludes all, or any part of, the period between the end of the academic year to the beginning of the next academic year to perform services during that period.

(2) A classified employee, for services performed as provided in this subdivision, shall receive, on a pro rata basis, not less than the compensation and benefits that are applicable to the classification of the additional assignment or service during the regular academic year.

(e) This section shall apply to districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 3 (commencing with Section 88060).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 280, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

88003.

(a) The governing board of a community college district shall employ persons for positions that are not academic positions. The governing board of a community college district, except where Article 3 (commencing with Section 88060) or Section 88137 applies, shall classify all those employees and positions. The employees and positions shall be known as the classified service. Substitute and short-term employees, employed and paid for less than 75 percent of a college year, shall not be a part of the classified service. Apprentices and professional experts employed on a temporary basis for a specific project, regardless of length of employment, shall not be a part of the classified service. Full-time students
 employed part time, and part-time students employed part time in a college work-study program, or in a work experience education program conducted by a community college district and that is financed by state or federal funds, shall not be a part of the classified service. Unless otherwise permitted, a person whose position does not require certification qualifications shall not be employed by a governing board of a community college district, except as authorized by this section.

(b) “Substitute employee,” as used in this section, means a person employed to replace a classified employee who is temporarily absent from duty. In addition, if the community college district is then engaged in a procedure to hire a permanent
 employee to fill a vacancy in a classified position, the governing board of the community college district may fill the vacancy through the employment, for not more than 60 calendar days, of one or more substitute employees, except to the extent that a collective bargaining agreement then in effect provides for a different period of time.

(c) “Short-term employee,” as used in this section, means a person who is employed to perform a service for the community college district, upon the completion of which, the service required or similar services will not be extended or needed on a continuing basis. Before employing a short-term employee, the governing board of a community college district, at a regularly scheduled meeting of the governing board of the community college district, shall specify the service required to be
 performed by the employee pursuant to the definition of “classification” in subdivision (a) of Section 88001, and shall certify the ending date of the service. The ending date may be shortened or extended by the governing board of the community college district, but shall not extend beyond 75 percent of a school year.

(d) “Seventy-five percent of a college year” means 195 working days, including holidays, sick leave, vacation, and other leaves of absences, irrespective of number of hours worked per day.

(e) Employment of either full-time or part-time students in a college work-study program or in a work experience education program shall not result in the displacement of classified personnel or impair existing contracts for services.

(f) This section shall apply only to community college districts not incorporating the merit system as outlined in Article 3 (commencing with Section 88060).

(g) An employee employed by a community college district in a part-time playground position as of the effective date of the laws placing part-time playground positions into the classified service shall be deemed a permanent employee of the community college district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 488, Sec. 2.   (AB 2160)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

88003.1.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, personal services contracting for all services currently or customarily performed by classified school employees to achieve cost savings is permissible, unless otherwise prohibited, when all the following conditions are met:

(1) The governing board or contracting agency clearly demonstrates that the proposed contract will result in actual overall cost savings to the community college district, provided that:

(A) In comparing costs, there shall be included the community college district’s additional cost of providing the same service as proposed by a contractor.
 These additional costs shall include the salaries and benefits of additional staff that would be needed and the cost of additional space, equipment, and materials needed to perform the function.

(B) In comparing costs, there shall not be included the community college district’s indirect overhead costs unless these costs can be attributed solely to the function in question and would not exist if that function was not performed by the community college district. Indirect overhead costs shall mean the pro rata share of existing administrative salaries and benefits, rent, equipment costs, utilities, and materials.

(C) In comparing costs, there shall be included in the cost of a contractor providing a service any continuing community college district costs that would be directly associated with the contracted function. These continuing community college district costs shall include,
 but not be limited to, those for inspection, supervision, and monitoring.

(2) Proposals to contract out work shall not be approved solely on the basis that savings will result from lower contractor pay rates or benefits. Proposals to contract out work shall be eligible for approval if the contractor’s wages are at the industry’s level and do not undercut community college district pay rates.

(3) The contract does not cause the displacement of community college district employees. The term “displacement” includes layoff, demotion, involuntary transfer to a new classification, involuntary transfer to a new location requiring a change of residence, and time base reductions. Displacement does not include changes in shifts or days off, nor does it include reassignment to other positions within the same classification and general location or employment with the contractor, so long as
 wages and benefits are comparable to those paid by the school district.

(4) The savings shall be large enough to ensure that they will not be eliminated by private sector and community college district cost fluctuations that could normally be expected during the contracting period.

(5) The amount of savings clearly justify the size and duration of the contracting agreement.

(6) The contract is awarded through a publicized, competitive bidding process.

(7) The contract includes specific provisions pertaining to the qualifications of the staff that will perform the work under the contract, as well as assurance that the contractor’s hiring practices meet applicable nondiscrimination standards.

(8) The potential for future economic risk to the community college district from potential contractor rate increases is minimal.

(9) The contract is with a firm. A “firm” means a corporation, limited liability company, partnership, nonprofit organization, or sole proprietorship.

(10) The potential economic advantage of contracting is not outweighed by the public’s interest in having a particular function performed directly by the community college district.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, personal services contracting shall also be permissible when any of the following conditions can be met:

(1) The contract is for new community college district functions and the Legislature has specifically mandated or authorized
 the performance of the work by independent contractors.

(2) The services contracted are not available within community college districts, cannot be performed satisfactorily by community college district employees, or are of such a highly specialized or technical nature that the necessary expert knowledge, experience, and ability are not available through the community college district.

(3) The services are incidental to a contract for the purchase or lease of real or personal property. Contracts under this criterion, known as “service agreements,” shall include, but not be limited to, agreements to service or maintain office equipment or computers that are leased or rented.

(4) The policy, administrative, or legal goals and purposes of the community college district cannot be accomplished through the utilization of
 persons selected pursuant to the regular or ordinary hiring process. Contracts are permissible under this criterion to protect against a conflict of interest or to ensure independent and unbiased findings in cases where there is a clear need for a different, outside perspective. These contracts shall include, but not be limited to, obtaining expert witnesses in litigation.

(5) The nature of the work is such that the criteria for emergency appointments apply. “Emergency appointment” means an appointment made for a period not to exceed 60 working days either during an actual emergency to prevent the stoppage of public business or because of the limited duration of the work. The method of selection and the qualification standards for an emergency employee shall be determined by the community college district. The frequency of appointment, length of employment, and the circumstances appropriate for the appointment of firms or individuals under
 emergency appointments shall be restricted so as to prevent the use of emergency appointments to circumvent the regular or ordinary hiring process.

(6) The contractor will provide equipment, materials, facilities, or support services that could not feasibly be provided by the community college district in the location where the services are to be performed.

(7) The services are of such an urgent, temporary, or occasional nature that the delay incumbent in their implementation under the community college district’s regular or ordinary hiring process would frustrate their very purpose.

(c) This section shall apply to all community colleges, including community college districts that have adopted the merit system.

(d) This section shall apply to personal
 service contracts entered into after January 1, 2003. This section shall not apply to the renewal of personal services contracts subsequent to January 1, 2003, where the contract was entered into before January 1, 2003, irrespective of whether the contract is renewed or rebid with the existing contractor or with a new contractor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 328, Sec. 58.   (SB 1330)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

88004.

Every position not defined by the regulations of the board of governors as an academic position and not specifically exempted from the classified service according to the provisions of Section 88003 or 88076 shall be classified as required by those sections and shall be a part of the classified service. These positions may not be designated as academic by the governing board of a district nor shall the assignment of a title to any such a position remove the position from the classified service.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit anyone from being employed in a classification because he or she possesses the minimum qualifications required of faculty members or academic administrators, nor shall the possession of those qualifications be grounds for the elimination of an individual from consideration for employment in a classified position.

This section shall apply to districts which have adopted the merit system in the same manner and with the same effect as though it were a part of Article 3 (commencing with Section 88060) of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 179.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

88004.5.

All contracts for management consulting services relating to food service shall be governed by this section.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 88003, 88004, 88020.5, and 88076, any community college district may enter into a contract for management consulting services relating to food service for a term not to exceed one year. Any renewal of that contract, or further requests for proposals to provide food service management consulting services, shall be considered on a year-to-year basis. A contract for food service management consulting services shall not cause or result in the elimination of any food service classified personnel or position. A contract for food service management consulting services shall not cause or result in any adverse effect upon any food service classified personnel or position with respect to wages, benefits, or other terms and conditions of employment.

(b) A contract made pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not provide for, or result in the supervision of, food service classified personnel by the food service management consultant. This section shall not be construed to prevent an entity providing food service management consulting services from interacting or consulting with the food service manager or director, supervisors, or food service classified employees of the community college district on matters relating to food services except those prohibited by subdivision (a).

(c) Sections 88021, 88022, 88023, 88024, and 88025, and any other health criteria established by the local community college district, are applicable to all persons providing food service management consulting services under this section.

(d) This section shall apply to all community college districts, including districts that have adopted the merit system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 189.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

88005.

(a) Nonacademic positions created by a governing board of a school district under the Manpower Development and Training Act of 1962, the Economic Opportunity Act of 1964, the Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965, or Section 11300 or Section 13650 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, any future federal or state legislative enactment, or any other special funding, and which are not a part of the regular school program shall, nevertheless, be a part of the classified service as established by Section 88003 or Section 88076 of this code.

Persons employed in such positions shall be classified employees and shall enjoy all the rights, burdens and benefits accorded other classified employees. Their selection and retention shall be made on the same basis as that of persons selected for positions that are a part of the regular school program.

(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (a), if specially funded positions are restricted to employment of persons in low-income groups, from designated impoverished areas and other criteria which restricts the privilege of all citizens to compete for employment in such positions, all such positions shall, in addition to the regular class title, be classified as “restricted.” Their selection and retention shall be made on the same basis as that of persons selected and retained in positions that are a part of the regular school program, except that persons employed in the following categories of restricted positions shall not be subject to the provisions of Section 88091 or 88092:

(1) The position of instructional aide, as defined in Section 88243.

(2) Any other position involving personal contacts with students or parents that is established to assist school-staff personnel responsible for school-community relations; educational support services for such areas as counseling, library or health; or the correction or prevention of behavioral problems.

Persons employed in positions properly classified as “restricted” shall be classified employees for all purposes except:

(A) They shall not be accorded employment permanency under Section 88013 or Section 88120 of the Education Code, whichever is applicable.

(B) They shall not acquire seniority credits for the purposes of Sections 88117 and 88127 of the Education Code or, in a district not having the merit (civil service) system, for the purposes of layoff for lack of work or lack of funds as may be established by rule of the governing board.

(C) The provisions of Sections 88106 and 88108 shall not apply to “restricted” employees.
